District of Columbia statutes.
25-821

Revocation or suspension — General provisions.

(a)

Except as provided in § 25-826, the Board shall not revoke or suspend a license until the licensee has been given an opportunity to be heard in his or her defense.

(b)

If a license is revoked or suspended, no part of the license fee shall be returned.

(c)

If the Board revokes a license, no license shall be issued to the same person or persons whose license is so revoked for any other location for 5 years following the revocation, except as provided below.

(d)

If the Board revokes a manager’s license, a manager’s license shall not be issued to the same person for 2 years.

(e)

Subsection (c) of this section shall not apply to licenses revoked by the Board for procedural reasons.

(f)

The remaining alcoholic beverage stock of a licensee whose license has been revoked shall be disposed of only with the approval of the Board.

History

Jan. 24, 1934, 48 Stat. 330, ch. 4, § 17
Aug. 27, 1935, 49 Stat. 900, ch. 756, § 9
Aug. 25, 1937, 50 Stat. 803, ch. 766, § 3
Apr. 26, 1950, 64 Stat. 88, ch. 106
Dec. 8, 1970, 84 Stat. 1393, Pub. L. 91-535, § 3(a)
Sept. 29, 1982, D.C. Law 4-157, §§ 9, 15, 29 DCR 3617
Mar. 8, 1984, D.C. Law 5-51, § 2(b)(5), 30 DCR 5927
Mar. 7, 1987, D.C. Law 6-217, § 11, 34 DCR 907
Sept. 11, 1993, D.C. Law 10-12, § 2(b), 40 DCR 4020
May 24, 1994, D.C. Law 10-122, § 2(h), 41 DCR 1658
Apr. 30, 1998, D.C. Law 12-97, § 2, 45 DCR 1517
May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 25-821.
1973 Ed., § 25-118.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(b) of the Underage Drinking Emergency Amendment Act of 1994 (D.C. Act 10-236, April 28, 1994, 41 DCR 2601).

Delegation of Authority

Delegation of Authority—Office of the Secretary, see Mayor’s Order 97-87, May 6, 1997 ( 44 DCR 2958).